Maryland, session 2026, SB0977.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–455.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMMISSION” MEANS THE MARYLAND POSITIVE YOUTH

SENATE BILL 977 3
DEVELOPMENT COMMISSION.
(3) “ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATIONS” MEANS COMMUNITY–BASED
ORGANIZATIONS, STATEWIDE YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATIONS, LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS, AND SCHOOLS DELIVERING YOUTH PROGRAMS OUTSIDE REGULAR
SCHOOL HOURS.
(4) “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND POSITIVE YOUTH
DEVELOPMENT FUND.
(5) “POSITIVE YOUTH DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMMING” MEANS
STRUCTURED, DEVELOPMENTALLY APPROPRIATE PROGRAMS OR ACTIVITIES THAT:
(I) ARE GROUNDED IN EVIDENCE–BASED OR
EVIDENCE–INFORMED PRACTICES;
(II) INCLUDE CONSISTENT, ENGAGED ADULT MENTORS OR
YOUTH DEVELOPMENT PROFESSIONALS;
(III) ARE PROVIDED BEFORE SCHOOL, AFTER SCHOOL, DURING
SUMMER, OR AT OTHER TIMES OUTSIDE REGULAR SCHOOL HOURS; AND
(IV) INCLUDE PROGRAMMING DESIGNED TO SUPPORT FAMILY
ENGAGEMENT.
(6) “YOUTH” MEANS INDIVIDUALS FROM BIRTH THROUGH 25 YEARS.
(B) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND POSITIVE YOUTH DEVELOPMENT
COMMISSION IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(I) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT, OR THE
SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE;
(II) FOUR MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR, WHO:
1. ARE AT LEAST 14 YEARS OLD AND UNDER THE AGE OF
25 YEARS AT THE TIME OF APPOINTMENT;
2. COLLECTIVELY REFLECT THE GEOGRAPHIC, RACIAL,
AND SOCIOECONOMIC DIVERSITY OF THE STATE; AND

SENATE BILL 977
3. HAVE PARTICIPATED IN OR HAVE BEEN IMPACTED BY
COMMUNITY–BASED YOUTH DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS;
(III) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A PARENT OF A YOUTH WHO RESIDES
IN A RURAL JURISDICTION, APPOINTED BY THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT;
(IV) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A PARENT OF A YOUTH WHO RESIDES
IN AN URBAN JURISDICTION, APPOINTED BY THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT;
(V) ONE MEMBER, APPOINTED BY THE SECRETARY OF THE
GOVERNOR’S OFFICE FOR CHILDREN;
(VI) ONE MEMBER, APPOINTED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL;
(VII) ONE MEMBER, APPOINTED BY THE SECRETARY OF
JUVENILE SERVICES;
(VIII) ONE MEMBER, APPOINTED BY THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN
SERVICES;
(IX) ONE MEMBER, APPOINTED BY THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH;
(X) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A LICENSED PSYCHOLOGIST OR
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL WITH EXPERTISE IN ADOLESCENT MENTAL
HEALTH AND THE IMPACT OF SOCIAL MEDIA USE, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR;
(XI) ONE MEMBER, APPOINTED BY THE COMPTROLLER;
(XII) TWO MEMBERS REPRESENTING THE LOCAL MANAGEMENT
BOARDS, APPOINTED BY THE COCHAIRS OF THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF
LOCAL MANAGEMENT BOARDS; AND
(XIII) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, WHO SHALL ACT IN AN
ADVISORY CAPACITY:
1. ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES,
APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
2. ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND,
APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
3. TWO MEMBERS FROM DIFFERENT GEOGRAPHIC
REGIONS OF THE STATE WHO REPRESENT STATEWIDE YOUTH–SERVING

SENATE BILL 977 5
ORGANIZATIONS, APPOINTED BY STATEWIDE YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATIONS;
AND
4. ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING A STATEWIDE
AFTERSCHOOL NETWORK, APPOINTED BY THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT.
(3) (I) THE TERM OF A MEMBER IS 2 YEARS.
(II) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE
UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED.
(III) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN
SERVES ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED.
(IV) THE TERMS SHALL BE STAGGERED WITH 50% OF THE
INITIAL MEMBERS SERVING 2 YEARS AND THE REMAINING INITIAL MEMBERS
SERVING 3 YEARS.
(4) THE COMMISSION SHALL BE COCHAIRED BY:
(I) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT; AND
(II) A MEMBER APPOINTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION WHO HAS BEEN SELECTED BY OTHER MEMBERS APPOINTED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(5) (I) THE COMMISSION SHALL MEET AT LEAST TWO TIMES PER
CALENDAR YEAR.
(II) THE COMMISSION IS SUBJECT TO THE OPEN MEETINGS
ACT.
(III) A MAJORITY OF THE VOTING MEMBERS OF THE
COMMISSION SHALL CONSTITUTE A QUORUM FOR THE TRANSACTION OF BUSINESS.
(IV) A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION:
1. MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF
THE COMMISSION; BUT
2. IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES
UNDER THE STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE
BUDGET.

SENATE BILL 977
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH A GRANT APPLICATION AND REVIEW PROCESS FOR
ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATIONS;
(2) MAKE GRANT AWARDS TO SUPPORT POSITIVE YOUTH
DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMMING ACROSS THE STATE;
(3) MONITOR AND EVALUATE ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATIONS THAT HAVE
RECEIVED A GRANT;
(4) ENSURE THE QUALITY AND POSITIVE OUTCOMES OF A GRANT;
AND
(5) ENSURE MEANINGFUL ENGAGEMENT OF YOUTH IN ALL ASPECTS
OF THE COMMISSION’S WORK, INCLUDING FUNDING PRIORITIES, GRANT REVIEW,
AND EVALUATION OF GRANTS.
(D) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND POSITIVE YOUTH DEVELOPMENT FUND.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO ELIGIBLE
ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE POSITIVE YOUTH DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMMING
TO YOUTHS.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(4) (I) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(II) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND
SEPARATELY, AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(5) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(I) ALL REVENUES CONSISTING OF FUNDS RECEIVED BY THE
STATE FROM ANY SOURCE RESULTING, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, FROM ANY
JUDGMENT AGAINST OR SETTLEMENT WITH SOCIAL MEDIA COMPANIES FOUND TO
HAVE HARMED YOUTH;
(II) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE
FUND;

SENATE BILL 977 7
(III) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED
FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(6) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY AS FOLLOWS:
(I) UP TO 10% OF THE FUNDS FOR THE ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS
OF THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FOR LITIGATION AGAINST SOCIAL
MEDIA COMPANIES;
(II) UP TO 10% OF THE FUNDS FOR THE ADMINISTRATION OF
THE COMMISSION AND GRANTS AUTHORIZED BY THE COMMISSION, INCLUDING
TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE AND CAPACITY–BUILDING SUPPORT FOR ELIGIBLE
ORGANIZATIONS; AND
(III) THE REMAINING FUNDS FOR GRANTS TO ELIGIBLE
ORGANIZATIONS UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(7) (I) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE
FUND IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(II) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE
CREDITED TO THE FUND.
(8) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(9) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR GRANTS TO ELIGIBLE
ORGANIZATIONS IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE
OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE APPROPRIATED FOR PROVIDING
POSITIVE YOUTH DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMMING TO YOUTHS.
(E) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE COMMISSION SHALL
REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON:
(1) REVENUES DEPOSITED INTO THE FUND;
(2) GRANTS AWARDED AND POPULATIONS SERVED BY THE GRANTS;
(3) THE OUTCOMES AND IMPACTS OF THE GRANTS; AND

SENATE BILL 977
(4) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR POLICY AND FUNDING CHANGES TO
ADVANCE POSITIVE YOUTH DEVELOPMENT IN THE STATE.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO CARRY
OUT THIS SECTION.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE MARYLAND POSITIVE YOUTH DEVELOPMENT
FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Section 1 of this Act is contingent on the State receiving funds resulting from
the execution of a final settlement agreement, judgment, or bankruptcy proceeding against
a social media company related to harm against children.
(b) The Attorney General shall provide written notice of the State receiving funds
resulting from the execution of a final settlement agreement, judgment, or bankruptcy
proceeding to the Department of Legislative Services, 90 State Circle, Annapolis, MD
21401.
(c) Section 1 of this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be null and void if, on or before June 30, 2030, the Department of Legislative Services
has not received notice from the Attorney General under subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section

SENATE BILL 977 9
2 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.